Utah statutes.
78B-3-411.   Limitation on attorney's contingency fee in malpractice action.

(1)  In any malpractice action against a health care provider as defined in Section 78B-3-403, an attorney may not collect a contingent fee for representing a client seeking damages in connection with or arising out of personal injury or wrongful death caused by the negligence of another which exceeds 33-1/3% of the amount recovered.

(2)  This limitation applies regardless of whether the recovery is by settlement, arbitration, judgment, or whether appeal is involved.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

